North Dakota statutes. TITLE 30.1 Uniform Probate Code
CHAPTER 30.1-29 Protection of Property of Persons Under Disability and Minors
30.1-29-24. (5-424)
Powers of conservator in administration.

A conservator has all of the powers conferred herein and any additional powers conferred by law on trustees in this state. In addition, a conservator of the estate of an unmarried minor, as to whom no one has parental rights, has the duties and powers of a guardian of a minor described in section 30.1-27-09 until the minor marries, but the parental rights so conferred on a conservator do not preclude appointment of a guardian as provided by chapter 30.1-27.

A conservator has power, without court authorization or confirmation, to invest and reinvest funds of the estate as would a trustee.

A conservator, acting reasonably in efforts to accomplish the purpose for which the conservator was appointed, may act without court authorization or confirmation, to:

Collect, hold, and retain assets of the estate, including land in another state, until, in the conservator’s judgment, disposition of the assets should be made, and the assets may be retained even though they include an asset in which the conservator is personally interested.

Receive additions to the estate.

Continue or participate in the operation of any business or other enterprise.

Acquire an undivided interest in an estate asset in which the conservator, in any fiduciary capacity, holds an undivided interest.

Invest and reinvest estate assets in accordance with subsection 2.

Deposit estate funds in a bank, including a bank operated by the conservator.

Acquire or dispose of an estate asset, including land in another state for cash or on credit, at public or private sale, and to manage, develop, improve, exchange, partition, change the character of, or abandon an estate asset.

Make ordinary or extraordinary repairs or alterations in buildings or other structures, demolish any improvements, and raze existing or erect new party walls or buildings.

Subdivide, develop, or dedicate land to public use, to make or obtain the vacation of plats and adjust boundaries, to adjust differences in valuation on exchange or to partition by giving or receiving considerations, and to dedicate easements to public use without consideration.

Enter for any purpose into a lease as lessor or lessee with or without option to purchase or renew for a term within or extending beyond the term of the conservatorship.

Enter into a lease or arrangement for exploration and removal of minerals or other natural resources or enter into a pooling or unitization agreement.

Grant an option involving disposition of an estate asset, to take an option for the acquisition of any asset.

Vote a security, in person or by general or limited proxy.

Pay calls, assessments, and any other sums chargeable or accruing against or on account of securities.

Sell or exercise stock or membership interest, subscription or conversion rights, to consent, directly or through a committee or other agent, to the reorganization, consolidation, merger, dissolution, or liquidation of a corporation, limited liability company, or other business enterprise.

Hold a security in the name of a nominee or in other form without disclosure of the conservatorship so that title to the security may pass by delivery, but the conservator is liable for any act of the nominee in connection with the stock so held.

Insure the assets of the estate against damage or loss, and the conservator against liability with respect to third persons.

Borrow money to be repaid from estate assets or otherwise, to advance money for the protection of the estate or the protected person, and for all expenses, losses, and liability sustained in the administration of the estate or because of the holding or ownership of any estate assets and the conservator has a lien on the estate as against the protected person for advances so made.

Pay or contest any claim, to settle a claim by or against the estate or the protected person by compromise, arbitration, or otherwise, and to release, in whole or in part, any claim belonging to the estate to the extent that the claim is uncollectible.

Pay taxes, assessments, compensation of the conservator, and other expenses incurred in the collection, care, administration, and protection of the estate.

Allocate items of income or expense to either estate income or principal, as provided by law, including creation of reserves out of income for depreciation, obsolescence, or amortization, or for depletion in mineral or timber properties.

Pay any sum distributable to a protected person or the protected person’s dependent without liability to the conservator, by paying the sum to the distributee or by paying the sum for the use of the distributee either to the distributee’s guardian or, if none, to a relative or other person with custody of the distributee’s person.

Employ persons, including attorneys, auditors, investment advisers, or agents, even though they are associated with the conservator, to advise or assist the conservator in the performance of the conservator’s administrative duties, to act upon their recommendation without independent investigation, and instead of acting personally, to employ one or more agents to perform any act of administration, whether or not discretionary.

Prosecute or defend actions, claims, or proceedings in any jurisdiction for the protection of estate assets and of the conservator in the performance of the conservator’s duties.

Execute and deliver all instruments which will accomplish or facilitate the exercise of the powers vested in the conservator.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

Cross-References.

Powers of trustees, see N.D.C.C. ch. 59-16.

30.1-29-25. (5-425)
Distributive duties and powers of conservator.

A conservator may expend or distribute income or principal of the estate without court authorization or confirmation for the support, education, care, or benefit of the protected person and the protected person’s dependents in accordance with the following principles:

The conservator is to consider recommendations relating to the appropriate standard of support, education, and benefit for the protected person made by a parent or guardian, if any. The conservator may not be surcharged for sums paid to persons or organizations actually furnishing support, education, or care to the protected person pursuant to the recommendations of a parent or guardian of the protected person unless the conservator knows that the parent or guardian is deriving personal financial benefit therefrom, including relief from any personal duty of support, or unless the recommendations are clearly not in the best interests of the protected person.

The conservator is to expend or distribute sums reasonably necessary for the support, education, care, or benefit of the protected person with due regard to:

The size of the estate, the probable duration of the conservatorship, and the likelihood that the protected person, at some future time, may be fully able to manage the protected person’s affairs and the estate which has been conserved for the protected person.

The accustomed standard of living of the protected person and members of the protected person’s household.

Other funds or sources used for the support of the protected person.

The conservator may expend funds of the estate for the support of persons legally dependent on the protected person and others who are members of the protected person’s household, who are unable to support themselves, and who are in need of support.

Funds expended under this subsection may be paid by the conservator to any person, including the protected person, to reimburse for expenditures that the conservator might have made, or in advance for services to be rendered to the protected person when it is reasonable to expect that they will be performed and advance payments are customary or reasonably necessary under the circumstances.

If the estate is ample to provide for the purposes implicit in the distributions authorized by the preceding subsection, a conservator for a protected person other than a minor has power to make gifts to charity and other objects as the protected person might have been expected to make, in amounts which do not exceed in total for any year twenty percent of the income from the estate.

When a minor who has not been adjudged disabled under subsection 2 of section 30.1-29-01 attains majority, the minor’s conservator, after meeting all prior claims and expenses of administration, shall pay over and distribute all funds and properties to the former protected person as soon as possible.

When the conservator is satisfied that a protected person’s disability other than minority has ceased, the conservator, after meeting all prior claims and expenses of administration, shall pay over and distribute all funds and properties to the former protected person as soon as possible.

If a protected person dies, the conservator shall deliver to the court for safekeeping any will of the deceased protected person which may have come into the conservator’s possession, inform the executor or a beneficiary named therein that the conservator has done so, and retain the estate for delivery to a duly appointed personal representative of the decedent or other persons entitled thereto. If after forty days from the death of the protected person no other person has been appointed personal representative and no application or petition for appointment is before the court, the conservator may apply to exercise the powers and duties of a personal representative so that the conservator may proceed to administer and distribute the decedent’s estate without additional or further appointment. Upon application for an order granting the powers of a personal representative to a conservator, after notice to any person demanding notice under section 30.1-13-04 and to any person nominated executor in any will of which the applicant is aware, the court may order the conferral of the power upon determining that there is no objection, and endorse the letters of the conservator to note that the formerly protected person is deceased and that the conservator has acquired all of the powers and duties of a personal representative. The making and entry of an order under this section shall have the effect of an order of appointment of a personal representative as provided in section 30.1-14-08 and chapters 30.1-17 through 30.1-21, except that estate in the name of the conservator, after administration, may be distributed to the decedent’s successors without prior retransfer to the conservator as personal representative.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 1.

30.1-29-26. (5-426)
Enlargement or limitation of powers of conservator.

Subject to the restrictions in subdivision d of subsection 2 of section 30.1-29-08, the court may confer on a conservator at the time of appointment or later, in addition to the powers conferred on the conservator by sections 30.1-29-24 and 30.1-29-25, any power which the court itself could exercise under subdivisions b and c of subsection 2 of section 30.1-29-08. The court may, at the time of appointment or later, limit the powers of a conservator otherwise conferred by sections 30.1-29-24 and 30.1-29-25, or previously conferred by the court, and may at any time relieve the conservator of any limitation. If the court limits any power conferred on the conservator by sections 30.1-29-24 and 30.1-29-25, the limitation shall be endorsed upon the conservator’s letters of appointment.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 1; 1999, ch. 50, § 50.

30.1-29-27. (5-427)
Preservation of estate plan.

In investing the estate, and in selecting assets of the estate for distribution under subsections 1 and 2 of section 30.1-29-25, in utilizing powers of revocation or withdrawal available for the support of the protected person, and exercisable by the conservator or the court, the conservator and the court should take into account any known estate plan of the protected person, including the protected person’s will, any revocable trust of which the protected person is settlor, and any contract, transfer, or joint ownership arrangement with provisions for payment or transfer of benefits or interests at the protected person’s death to another or others which the protected person may have originated. The conservator may examine the will of the protected person.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 1.

30.1-29-28. (5-428)
Claims against protected person — Enforcement.

A conservator must pay from the estate all just claims against the estate and against the protected person arising before or after the conservatorship upon their presentation and allowance. A claim may be presented by either of the following methods:

The claimant may deliver or mail to the conservator a written statement of the claim indicating its basis, the name and address of the claimant, and the amount claimed.

The claimant may file a written statement of the claim, in the form prescribed by rule, with the clerk of the court and deliver or mail a copy of the statement to the conservator.

A claimant whose claim has not been paid may petition the court for determination of the claim at any time before it is barred by the applicable statute of limitation, and, upon due proof, procure an order for its allowance and payment from the estate. If a proceeding is pending against a protected person at the time of appointment of a conservator or is initiated against the protected person thereafter, the moving party must give notice of the proceeding to the conservator if the outcome is to constitute a claim against the estate.

If it appears that the estate in conservatorship is likely to be exhausted before all existing claims are paid, preference is to be given to prior claims for the care, maintenance, and education of the protected person or the protected person’s dependents and existing claims for expenses of administration.

A claim is deemed presented on the first to occur of either receipt of the written statement of claim by the conservator, or the filing of the claim with the court. A presented claim is allowed if it is not disallowed by written statement mailed by the conservator to the claimant within sixty days after its presentation. The presentation of a claim tolls any statute of limitation relating to the claim until thirty days after its disallowance.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 1.

Collateral References.

Obligations or expenditures: right of guardian or committee of incompetent to incur obligations so as to bind incompetent or his estate, or to make expenditures, without approval of court, 63 A.L.R.3d 780.

Power of incompetent spouse’s guardian or representative to sue for granting or vacation compromise or settlement in such suit, 32 A.L.R.5th 673.

30.1-29-29. (5-429)
Individual liability of conservator.

Unless otherwise provided in the contract, a conservator is not individually liable on a contract properly entered into in the conservator’s fiduciary capacity in the course of administration of the estate unless the conservator fails to reveal the conservator’s representative capacity and identify the estate in the contract.

The conservator is individually liable for obligations arising from ownership or control of property of the estate or for torts committed in the course of administration of the estate only if the conservator is personally at fault.

Claims based on contracts entered into by a conservator in the conservator’s fiduciary capacity, on obligations arising from ownership or control of the estate, or on torts committed in the course of administration of the estate, may be asserted against the estate by proceeding against the conservator in the conservator’s fiduciary capacity, whether or not the conservator is individually liable therefor.

Any question of liability between the estate and the conservator individually may be determined in a proceeding for accounting, surcharge, or indemnification, or other appropriate proceeding or action.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 1.

Collateral References.

Torts committed by guardian, committee, or trustee in managing estate, liability of incompetent’s estate for, 40 A.L.R.2d 1103.

Interest on ward’s funds, guardian’s liability for, 72 A.L.R.2d 757.

30.1-29-30. (5-430)
Termination of proceeding.

The protected person, the protected person’s personal representative, the conservator, or any other interested person may petition the court to terminate the conservatorship. A protected person seeking termination is entitled to the same rights and procedures as in an original proceeding for a protective order. The court, upon determining, after notice and hearing, that the minority or disability of the protected person has ceased, may terminate the conservatorship. Upon termination, title to assets of the estate passes to the former protected person or to the protected person’s successors subject to provision in the order for expenses of administration or to conveyances from the conservator to the former protected person or the former protected person’s successors to evidence the transfer.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 1.

30.1-29-31. (5-431)
Payment of debt and delivery of property to foreign conservator without local proceedings.

Any person indebted to a protected person, or having possession of property or of an instrument evidencing a debt, stock, or chose in action belonging to a protected person may pay or deliver to a conservator, guardian of the estate, or other like fiduciary appointed by a court of the state of residence of the protected person, upon being presented with proof of the appointment and an affidavit made by the fiduciary or on the fiduciary’s behalf stating:

That no protective proceeding relating to the protected person is pending in this state.

That the foreign conservator is entitled to payment or to receive delivery.

If the person to whom the affidavit is presented is not aware of any protective proceeding pending in this state, payment or delivery in response to the demand and affidavit discharges the debtor or possessor.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 1.

30.1-29-32. (5-432)
Delivery to foreign conservator. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 278, § 2.